Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-4,106
Appeal; effect.

Appeal from the sentence of conviction shall constitute an appeal from the revocation of the operator's license of the person so convicted.

Laws 1929, c. 148, § 12, p. 518;

C.S.1929, § 60-412;

Laws 1937, c. 140, § 2, p. 505;

Laws 1941, c. 124, § 2, p. 471;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 60-412;

R.S.1943, § 60-429;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-429;

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 56;

Laws 2001, LB 38, § 24.